02_Morphology/arn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                   ! Nombre
%<cmp%>                 ! Composición

%>                      ! Frontera de morfema
%+                      ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma léxica)
%#                      ! Frontera de palabras compuestas (forma superficial)


LEXICON Root

Nouns  ;

LEXICON Cmp

%<cmp%>%+:%# Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>:%> Cmp ;
%<n%>: # ;

LEXICON Nouns

mapu:mapu N ; !"tierra, land"
che:che N ; ! "gente, people"
mamüll:mamüll N ; ! "madera, wood"
wangku:wangku N ; ! "silla, chair"

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;
